California statutes. Vehicle Code
(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, before an apportioned registration may be reissued after a suspension is terminated, there shall, in addition to other fees required by this code, be paid to the department a fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150). This fee shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account to cover the department’s cost of administering this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a hearing shall not be provided when the suspension is based solely on notification by a federal agency that interstate operation is prohibited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

Except as provided in subdivision (e), a vehicle or a fleet for which the apportioned registration has been suspended pursuant to this article shall not be operated in interstate or intrastate commerce unless evidence is provided to the department that the vehicle or the fleet is to be operated by a person whose apportioned registration is not subject to a suspension pursuant to this article and who has a valid apportioned registration pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) or Division 14.85.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Enforcement of Liens on Apportioned Fleet Vehicles [8200. - 8204.]

8200.

“Registrant,” for purposes of this article, means any person issued apportioned fleet registration pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

8201.

(a) Fees determined to be due, including penalties and service fees, for the operation of a fleet apportionately registered vehicle shall be a lien upon all vehicles operated as part of the fleet and on any other fleet vehicles operated by the registrant. The department may collect the amount of the lien, plus costs, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), in an appropriate civil action and by seizure and sale of the vehicle.

(b) Liens arising as the result of an audit expire four years from the date the registration fees first become due unless the lien is perfected pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) Any lien arising under this section that is not subject to subdivision (b) expires three years from the date the fee or penalty first became due unless the lien is perfected pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) A lien shall be perfected when a notice is mailed to the registrant at the address shown on the department’s records and the lien is recorded on the electronic vehicle registration records of the department. A perfected lien shall expire five years from the date of perfection.

(e) Prior to the expiration of the statute of limitations, the registrant may consent to a waiver which would allow the assessment of fees and penalties past the statute of limitations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 758, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8202.

(a) Within 30 days of the date the notice is mailed pursuant to Section 8201, the registrant may submit documentation not previously available or may request a hearing to contest the existence or the amount of the lien. If no additional documentation is submitted, or if no hearing is requested, the operating privileges of the fleet may be suspended or canceled and a sufficient number of vehicles may be seized and sold to satisfy the lien.

(b) If additional documentation is submitted, the department shall review the documentation and issue its findings to the registrant. Within 30 days of the date the findings are mailed, the registrant may request a hearing.

(c) If a hearing is requested, 10 days’ notice shall be given of the time and place of the hearing, which shall be held within the county of residence of the person requesting the hearing or within the county of the established place of business of the registrant. The hearing shall be conducted by a referee who shall submit findings and recommendations to the director or his or her authorized representative, who shall decide the matter. The decision shall be effective on notice thereof to the interested parties. However, the director, or his or her authorized representative, may rescind the decision and reconsider the matter for good cause shown at any time within three years after the date the disputed fee or penalty first became due, or one year from the hearing whichever is later.

(d) Upon final completion of all administrative appeals, the department shall give written notice to
 the registrant of the right to a review of the decision by a court of competent jurisdiction. Any action brought in court shall be commenced within 90 days from the date notice of the decision is mailed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 478, Sec. 10.   (AB 2777)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8203.

(a) When a lien is perfected pursuant to Section 8200 and the opportunity to submit additional documentation or to request a hearing has passed, the department may suspend or cancel the operating privileges of the fleet. When the suspension takes effect, the department may seize a sufficient number of vehicles to satisfy the lien without further notice, upon obtaining authorization for the seizure and sale from the director or his or her authorized representative.

(b) Members of the California Highway Patrol, and peace officers employed by local authorities, are agents of the department for the purposes of this section. 

(c) In all cases, prior to the sale, a notice of the lien and intent to sell the vehicle shall be given by the department to the registrant, the known legal and registered owners, and to any other person known to be claiming an interest in the vehicle. The department shall also give public notice of the lien by placing an advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the registrant’s place of business is located.

(d) At any time before seizure and sale, any person claiming an interest in the vehicle may pay the department the amount of the lien, plus costs. In that event, the seizure and sale shall not be held, and the vehicle, shall be returned by the department to the person entitled to its possession.

(e) Any property found by the department in any vehicle seized under the provisions of this article shall be handled by the department in the manner provided in Sections 2414 and 2415.

(f) The sale shall be conducted and proceeds distributed pursuant to Section 9802.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8204.

(a) When a transferee or purchaser of an apportionately registered fleet vehicle applies to the department for transfer of ownership and it is determined by the department that there is an outstanding lien against the fleet in which the vehicle was operated, that fees became due prior to the transfer or purchase of the vehicle, and that the transferee or the purchaser was not cognizant of the fact that a lien existed, the department may waive apportioned registration fees and any penalties that are due.

(b) When fees and penalties are waived pursuant to subdivision (a), the apportioned registration fees and penalties shall become the liability of the registrant who failed to pay the fees and penalties when they became due. The fees and penalties may be collected by the department in an appropriate civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Offenses Against Registration Laws and Suspension, Revocation, and Cancellation of Registration [8800. - 8804.]

8800.

(a) The department may suspend, cancel, or revoke the registration of a vehicle or a certificate of ownership, registration card, license plate, or permit under any of the following circumstances:

(1) When the department is satisfied that the registration or the certificate, card, plate, or permit was fraudulently obtained or erroneously issued.

(2) When the department determines that a registered vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated or moved upon the highways.

(3) When a registered vehicle has been dismantled or wrecked.

(4) When the department determines that the required fee has not been paid and the same is not paid upon reasonable notice and demand.

(5) When a registration card, license plate, or permit is knowingly displayed upon a vehicle other than the one for which issued.

(6) When the registration could have been refused when last issued or renewed.

(7) When the department determines that the owner or legal owner has committed an offense under Sections 20 (with respect to an application for the registration of a vehicle), 4000, 4159 to 4163, inclusive, 4454, 4456, 4461, 4463, 5202, 10750, and 10751, involving the registration or the certificate, card, plate, or permit to be suspended, canceled, or revoked.

(8) When the department is so authorized pursuant to any other provision of law.

(b) The department may suspend the registration of all vehicles registered in the name of a person, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) When the United States Secretary of the Department of Transportation or his or her designee issues a lawful out-of-service order pursuant to Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) When the department suspends or revokes a motor carrier of property permit.

(3) When the Public Utilities Commission suspends or revokes operating authority or private registration.

(c) A suspension imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall remain in effect and a vehicle for which registration has been suspended shall not be registered in the name of the person until the department verifies that person’s federal registration, federal operating authority, California operating authority, California private registration, or motor carrier of property permit is reissued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

The department may suspend, cancel, revoke, or renew any permanent registration made under Section 4155 when the department determines that it is advisable to reissue the registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

Whenever the department cancels, suspends, or revokes the registration of a vehicle or a certificate of ownership, registration card, or license plates, or any nonresident or other permit, the owner or person in possession shall immediately return the documents, plates, certificates, or other evidence of registration to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

Whenever the department cancels, suspends, or revokes any license issued pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100), the licensee or person in possession shall immediately return the license, documents, plates, certificates, and other evidence of the license to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

Every person who, while a resident, as defined in Section 516, of this state, with respect to any vehicle owned by him and operated in this state, registers or renews the registration for the vehicle in a foreign jurisdiction, without the payment of appropriate fees and taxes to this state, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 409, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Registration and Weight Fees [9101. - 9808.]



  ARTICLE 1. Exemptions [9101. - 9107.]

9101.

No fees specified in this code, except fees not exempted under Section 9103, need be paid for any vehicle operated by the state, or by any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state, or the United States, as lessee under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement that grants possession of the vehicle to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.

The fees specified in this code except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards need not be paid for any vehicle owned by an educational institution of collegiate grade not conducted for profit and having an enrollment of 5,000 students or more and having an acreage of 5,000 acres or more, if such vehicle is used for fire-fighting purposes within the limits of the acreage of such institution and is operated principally on roads owned by such institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9102.5.

(a) In lieu of all other fees which are specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards, a fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be paid for the registration and licensing of any privately owned schoolbus, as defined in Section 545, which is either of the following:

(1) Owned by a private nonprofit educational organization and operated in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Education and the Department of the California
 Highway Patrol exclusively in transporting school pupils, or school pupils and employees, of the private nonprofit educational organization.

(2) Operated in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Education and the Department of the California Highway Patrol exclusively in transporting school pupils, or school pupils and employees, of any public school or private nonprofit educational organization pursuant to a contract between a public school district or nonprofit educational organization and the owner or operator of the schoolbus.

This section does not apply to any schoolbus which is operated pursuant to any contract which requires the public school district or nonprofit educational organization to pay any amount representing the costs of registration and weight fees unless and until the contract is amended to require only the payment of an amount representing the fee required
 by this section.

(b) When a schoolbus under contract and registered pursuant to subdivision (a) is to be temporarily operated in such a manner that it becomes subject to full registration fees specified in this code, the owner may, prior to that operation, as an alternative to the full registration, secure a temporary permit to operate the vehicle in this state for any one or more calendar months. The permit shall be posted upon the windshield or other prominent place upon the vehicle, and shall identify the vehicle to which it is affixed. When so affixed, the permit shall serve as indicia of full registration for the period designated on the permit. Upon payment of the fees specified in Section 9266.5, the department may issue a temporary permit under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision, any schoolbus used exclusively to transport students at or below the
 12th-grade level to or from any school, for an education-related purpose, or for an activity sponsored by a nonprofit organization shall be deemed to be a schoolbus for the purposes of this section and shall pay a fee of fifteen dollars ($15) in lieu of all other fees which are specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards.

(d) This section does not apply to a schoolbus, operated to transport persons who are developmentally disabled, as defined by the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500) of the Welfare and Institutions Code), to or from vocational, prevocational, or work training centers sponsored by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

9103.

(a) Fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards, are not required to be paid for any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code owned by the United States or by any state or political subdivision of a state or by any municipality duly organized under the California Constitution or laws of this state.

(b) The registration fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards, are not required to be paid for any vehicle owned by a public entity described in subdivision (f) of Section 15975 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 200, Sec. 8.   (SB 734)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.

The fees specified in this code except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards need not be paid for any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code owned by a public fire department organized as a nonprofit corporation and used exclusively for firefighting or rescue purposes or exclusively as an ambulance, nor for any vehicle owned by a voluntary fire department organized under the laws of this state and used exclusively for firefighting or rescue purposes or exclusively as an ambulance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 517.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.2.

The fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates, or cards need not be paid for a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe that has entered into a mutual aid agreement with a state, county, city, or other governmental municipality for fire protection and emergency response, and the equipment is used exclusively for firefighting or rescue purposes or exclusively as an ambulance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9104.5.

The fees specified in this code, except fees for registration under Section 9250, need not be paid for any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code if the vehicle is owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe and the vehicle is used exclusively within the boundaries of lands under the jurisdiction of that Indian tribe, including the incidental use of that vehicle on highways within those boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 911, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

(a) Except for fees for duplicate license plates, duplicate certificates, or duplicate cards, the fees specified in this code need not be paid for a vehicle that is of a type subject to registration under this code, and that is not used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, when owned by any of the following:

(1) A disabled veteran.

(2) A former American prisoner of war.

(3) The surviving spouse of a former American prisoner of war who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.5.

(4) A
 Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(5) The surviving spouse of a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.6.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a) shall not extend to more than one vehicle owned by a former American prisoner of war, a disabled veteran, or a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient, or a surviving spouse, and is applicable to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 10783, or subdivision (b) of Section 10783.2, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) (1) The department may require a disabled veteran applying for an exemption under this section to submit a certificate signed by a physician and surgeon, or to the extent that it does not cause a reduction in the receipt of federal
 aid highway funds, by a nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, physician assistant, chiropractor, or optometrist, substantiating the disability.

(2) The department may require a person applying for an exemption under this section for either of the following reasons to do any of the following:

(A) By reason of the person’s status as a former prisoner of war, to show, by satisfactory proof, the person’s former prisoner-of-war status.

(B) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the Congressional Medal of Honor, to show, by satisfactory proof, that
 the person is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “vehicle” means any of the following:

(1) A passenger motor vehicle.

(2) A motorcycle.

(3) A commercial motor vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 1.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 382.)
-------------------------------------------

9105.

(a) Except for fees for duplicate license plates, duplicate certificates, or duplicate cards, the fees specified in this code need not be paid for a vehicle that is of a type subject to registration under this code, and that is not used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, when owned by any of the following:

(1) A disabled veteran.

(2) A former American prisoner of war.

(3) The surviving spouse of a former American prisoner of war who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.5.

(4) A Congressional Medal of
 Honor recipient.

(5) The surviving spouse of a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.6.

(6) A Purple Heart recipient.

(7) The surviving spouse of a Purple Heart recipient who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.8.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a) does not extend to more than one vehicle owned by a former American prisoner of war, a disabled veteran, a Purple Heart recipient, or a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient, or a surviving spouse, and applies to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 10783, or subdivision (b) of Section 10783.2, of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) (1) The department may require a disabled veteran applying for an exemption under this section to submit a certificate signed by a physician and surgeon, or to the extent that it does not cause a reduction in the receipt of federal aid highway funds, by a nurse practitioner, certified nurse midwife, physician assistant, chiropractor, or optometrist, substantiating the disability.

(2) The department may require a person applying for an exemption under this section for either of the following reasons to do any of the following:

(A) By reason of the person’s status as a former prisoner of war, to show, by satisfactory proof, the person’s former prisoner-of-war status.

(B) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the
 Congressional Medal of Honor, to show, by satisfactory proof, that the person is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(C) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the Purple Heart, to show, by satisfactory proof, that the person is a Purple Heart recipient.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “vehicle” means any of the following:

(1) A passenger motor vehicle.

(2) A motorcycle.

(3) A commercial motor vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 2.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9106.

The fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate plates, certificates or cards, need not be paid for any vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code which is operated by the Civil Air Patrol, when the vehicle has been transferred to the Civil Air Patrol by the United States Government, or any agency thereof, if by federal regulation or directive the use of such vehicle is restricted to defined activities of the Civil Air Patrol, and if by federal regulation or directive the vehicle must be returned to the United States Government when no longer required or suited for use by the Civil Air Patrol. Such vehicles shall be registered as otherwise required
 under this code by the Civil Air Patrol and the Civil Air Patrol shall display a license plate or plates bearing distinguishing marks or symbols as specified in this code, which plate or plates shall be furnished by the department free of charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9107.

The weight fees for commercial vehicles specified in Sections 9400 and 9400.1 do not apply to any of the following:

(a) A vehicle operated by a passenger stage corporation, as defined in Section 226 of the Public Utilities Code, that is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The vehicle is operated exclusively on any line or lines having a one-way route mileage
 not exceeding 15 miles, and each of those lines is operated in either of the following areas:

(A) In urban or suburban areas or between cities in close proximity.

(B) Between nonadjacent urban or suburban areas or cities, the area between which is substantially residential, commercial, or industrial as distinguished from rural.

(2) The principal business of the passenger stage corporation is the operation of vehicles on a route or routes as defined in paragraph (1).

(b) A vehicle operated exclusively on any line or lines within the limits of a single city by a person engaged as a common carrier of passengers between fixed termini or over a regular route, 98 percent of whose operations, as measured by total route mileage operated, are exclusively within
 the limits of a single city, and who by reason thereof is not a passenger stage corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(c) Vanpool vehicles.

(d) A vehicle purchased with federal funds under the authority of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 5310 of Title 49 of the United States Code or Chapter 35 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 42 of the United States Code for the purpose of providing specialized transportation services to senior citizens and handicapped persons by public and private nonprofit operators of specialized transportation service agencies.

(e) A vehicle operated solely for the purpose of providing specialized transportation services to senior citizens and persons with disabilities, by a nonprofit, public benefit consolidated transportation service
 agency designated under Section 15975 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration Fees [9250. - 9271.]

9250.

(a) A registration fee of forty-three dollars ($43) shall be paid to the department for the registration of each vehicle or trailer coach of a type subject to registration under this code, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees. This subdivision applies to all of the following:

(1) The initial or original registration, on or after July 1, 2011, but before April 1, 2017, of any vehicle not previously registered in this state.

(2) The renewal of registration of any vehicle for which the registration period expires on or after July 1, 2011, but before April 1, 2017.

(b) A registration fee of fifty-three dollars ($53) shall be paid to the department for the registration of each vehicle or trailer coach of a type subject to registration under this code, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees. This subdivision applies to all of the following:

(1) The initial or original registration, on or after April 1, 2017, of any vehicle not previously registered in this state.

(2) The renewal or original registration of any vehicle for which the registration period expires on or after April 1, 2017, regardless of whether a renewal application was mailed to the registered owner before April 1, 2017.

(c) The registration fee imposed under this section applies to all
 vehicles described in Section 5004, whether or not special identification plates are issued to that vehicle.

(d) Trailer coaches are subject to the registration fee provided in subdivision (a) or (b) for each unit of the trailer coach.

(e) The amounts collected pursuant to the increase in the registration fee as specified in subdivision (b) shall be used only for costs incurred in connection with the regulation of vehicles, including administrative costs for vehicle registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 6.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.1.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2008, the fee described in Section 9250 shall be increased by three dollars ($3).

(b) Two dollars ($2) of the increase shall be deposited into the Alternative and Renewable Fuel and Vehicle Technology Fund created by Section 44273 of the Health and Safety Code, and one dollar ($1) shall be deposited into the Enhanced Fleet Modernization Subaccount created by Section 44126 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2035, and, as of January 1, 2036, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 319, Sec. 12.   (AB 126)   Effective October 7, 2023.   Inoperative July 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2036, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.2.

(a) The department, if requested by the Sacramento Metropolitan Air Quality Management District pursuant to Section 41081 of the Health and Safety Code, shall impose and collect a surcharge on the registration fees for every motor vehicle registered in that district, not to exceed the amount of six dollars ($6), as specified by the governing body of that district.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that
 is enacted before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 401, Sec. 36) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 355, Sec. 24.   (AB 2836)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 25 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.2.

(a) The department, if requested by the Sacramento Metropolitan Air Quality Management District pursuant to Section 41081 of the Health and Safety Code, shall impose and collect a surcharge on the registration fees for every motor vehicle registered in that district, not to exceed four dollars ($4).

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2034.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 401, Sec. 37) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 355, Sec. 25.   (AB 2836)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.4.

(a) The department shall, if requested by a countywide transportation planning agency, collect the fee imposed pursuant to Section 65089.20 of the Government Code upon the registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle registered in the county, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(b) The countywide transportation planning agency shall pay for the initial setup and programming costs identified by the department through a direct contract with the department. Any direct contract payment by the board shall be repaid, with no restriction on the funds, to the countywide transportation planning agency as part of the initial revenues available for distribution.

(c) (1) After deducting all costs incurred pursuant to this section, the department shall distribute the net revenues pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 65089.20 of the Government Code.

(2) The costs deducted under paragraph (1) shall not be counted against the 5-percent administrative cost limit specified in subdivision (d) of Section 65089.20 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.   (SB 83)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.5.

(a) The department shall, if requested by the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County, collect the fee imposed pursuant to Section 65089.11 of the Government Code upon the registration or renewal of registration of any motor vehicle registered in the county, except those vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(b) The City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County shall pay for the initial setup and
 programming costs identified by the Department of Motor Vehicles through a direct contract with the department. Any direct contract payment by the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County shall be repaid, with no restriction on the funds, to the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County as part of the initial revenues distributed. Regular Department of Motor Vehicles collection costs shall be in accordance with subdivision (c). These costs shall not be counted against the 5-percent administration cost limit specified in subdivision (e) of Section 65089.12.

(c) After deducting all costs incurred pursuant to this section, the department shall distribute the revenues to the City/County Association of Governments of San Mateo County.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 931, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.6.

(a) In addition to any other fees specified in this code, or the Revenue and Taxation Code, commencing July 1, 2020, a road improvement fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be paid to the department for registration or renewal of registration of every zero-emission motor vehicle model year 2020 and later subject to registration under this code, except those motor vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from payment of registration fees.

(b) On January 1, 2021, and every January 1 thereafter, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall adjust the road improvement fee imposed under subdivision (a) by increasing the fee in an amount equal to the increase in the California Consumer Price Index for the prior year, except the first adjustment shall cover the
 prior six months, as calculated by the Department of Finance, with amounts equal to or greater than fifty cents ($0.50) rounded to the highest whole dollar. The incremental change shall be added to the associated fee rate for that year.

(c) Any changes to the road improvement fee imposed by subdivision (a) that are enacted by legislation subsequent to July 1, 2017, shall be deemed to be changes to the base fee rate for purposes of the California Consumer Price Index calculation and adjustment performed pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) Revenues from the road improvement fee, after deduction of the department’s administrative costs related to this section, shall be deposited in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account created pursuant to Section 2031 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) This section does not
 apply to a commercial motor vehicle subject to Section 9400.1.

(f) This section does not apply to a vehicle issued apportioned registration pursuant to the International Registration Plan.

(g) The road improvement fee required pursuant to this section does not apply to the initial registration after the purchase of a new zero-emission motor vehicle.

(h) For purposes of this section, “zero-emission motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle as described in subdivision (d) of Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 22.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9250.7.

(a) (1) A service authority established under Section 22710 may impose a service fee of one dollar ($1) on all vehicles, except vehicles described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1, registered to an owner with an address in the county that established the service authority. The fee shall be paid to the department at the time of registration, or renewal of registration, or when renewal becomes delinquent, except on vehicles that are expressly exempted under this code from the payment of registration fees.

(2) In addition to the one-dollar ($1) service fee, and upon the implementation of the permanent trailer identification plate program, and as part of the
 Commercial Vehicle Registration Act of 2001, all commercial motor vehicles subject to Section 9400.1 registered to an owner with an address in the county that established a service authority under this section shall pay an additional service fee of two dollars ($2).

(b) The department, after deducting its administrative costs, shall transmit, at least quarterly, the net amount collected pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Treasurer for deposit in the Abandoned Vehicle Trust Fund, which is hereby created. All money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the Controller for allocation to a service authority that has an approved abandoned vehicle abatement program pursuant to Section 22710, and for payment of the administrative costs of the Controller. After deduction of its administrative costs, the Controller shall allocate the money in the Abandoned Vehicle Trust Fund to each service authority in proportion to the revenues received from the
 fee imposed by that authority pursuant to subdivision (a). If any funds received by a service authority pursuant to this section are not expended to abate abandoned vehicles pursuant to an approved abandoned vehicle abatement program that has been in existence for at least two full fiscal years within 90 days of the close of the fiscal year in which the funds were received and the amount of those funds exceeds the amount expended by the service authority for the abatement of abandoned vehicles in the previous fiscal year, the fee imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be suspended for one year, commencing on July 1 following the Controller’s determination pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) Every service authority that imposes a fee authorized by subdivision (a) shall issue a fiscal yearend report to the Controller on or before October 31 of each year summarizing all of the following:

(1) The total revenues received by the service authority during the previous fiscal year.

(2) The total expenditures by the service authority during the previous fiscal year.

(3) The total number of vehicles abated during the previous fiscal year.

(4) The average cost per abatement during the previous fiscal year.

(5) Any additional, unexpended fee revenues for the service authority during the previous fiscal year.

(6) The number of notices to abate issued to vehicles during the previous fiscal year.

(7) The number of vehicles disposed of pursuant to an ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 22710 during the
 previous fiscal year.
